Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2807
Property; unpaid taxes; sale; proceeds; disposition.

The proceeds of such sale shall be first applied toward payment of all taxes or special assessments and all interest, penalties and costs thereon in the same manner as proceeds from tax foreclosure sales. If there are any proceeds remaining, such remainder shall be applied against any other liens held by the owner and if there remain any further proceeds, such proceeds shall be distributed as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 7, p. 1496.